California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 subdivision (a) or (d), as applicable, shall be borne by the load-serving entity, as defined in Section 380, that failed to perform.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 7.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

454.52.

(a) (1) Beginning in 2017, and to be updated regularly thereafter, the commission shall adopt a process for each load-serving entity to file an integrated resource plan, and a schedule for periodic updates to the plan, and shall ensure that load-serving entities do all of the following:

(A) Meet the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established by the State Air Resources Board, in coordination with the commission and the Energy Commission, for the electricity sector and each load-serving entity that reflect the electricity sector’s percentage in achieving the economywide greenhouse gas emissions reductions pursuant to Section 38566 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Procure at least 60 percent eligible renewable energy resources by December 31, 2030, consistent with the state policy specified in Section 454.53 and Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3.

(C) Enable each electrical corporation to fulfill its obligation to serve its customers at just and reasonable rates.

(D) Minimize impacts on ratepayers’ bills.

(E) (i) Ensure system and local reliability on a short-term, midterm, and long-term basis, including meeting the short-term and forecast long-term resource adequacy requirements of Section 380, and require sufficient, predictable resource procurement and development to avoid unplanned energy supply shortfalls by taking into account impacts due to climate change, forecasted levels of building and transportation
 electrification, and other factors that can result in those shortfalls.

(ii) In furtherance of avoiding unplanned energy supply shortfalls or expensive emergency procurement and ensuring a more accurate understanding of electrical grid operational needs, the commission shall aggregate reported short-term and midterm resource procurement from all load-serving entities conducted under Section 380 or this section and assess midterm resource sufficiency, and annually provide anonymized reports to the Independent System Operator. The commission shall report forward resource procurement using counting conventions that provide the data to the Independent System Operator to be used in its grid planning.

(iii) To accomplish clause (i), the commission shall, as part of the integrated planning process, assess short-term, midterm, and long-term reliability by conducting probabilistic
 reliability modeling, including if there is sufficient capacity available for procurement in the short term and midterm by all load-serving entities to meet their procurement requirements. The commission shall review the results of that reliability modeling in a public proceeding at the same frequency as the forecast conducted in accordance with this section. When modeling short-term and midterm reliability, the commission shall model all procurement consistent with clause (ii) and may rely upon or incorporate probabilistic reliability modeling conducted by the Energy Commission into the commission’s public process. The commission shall also report the modeling results in the joint Reliability Planning Assessments conducted under Section 25233 of the Public Resources Code.

(F) Comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.13.

(G) Strengthen the diversity,
 sustainability, and resilience of the bulk transmission and distribution systems, and local communities.

(H) Enhance distribution systems and demand-side energy management.

(I) Minimize localized air pollutants and other greenhouse gas emissions, with early priority on disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(J) Maintain a diverse portfolio of energy resources, which may include eligible energy resources procured by the Department of Water Resources.

(2) (A) The commission may authorize all source procurement for load-serving entities that includes various resource types including demand-side resources, supply-side resources, and resources that may be either demand-side
 resources or supply-side resources, taking into account the differing load-serving entities’ geographic service areas, to ensure that each load-serving entity meets the goals set forth in paragraph (1).

(B) The commission may approve procurement of resource types that will reduce the overall emissions of greenhouse gases from the electricity sector and meet the other goals specified in paragraph (1), but due to the nature of the technology or fuel source may not compete favorably in price against other resources over the time period of the integrated resource plan.

(3) In furtherance of the requirements of paragraph (1), the commission shall consider the role of existing renewable generation, grid operational efficiencies, energy storage, and distributed energy resources, including energy efficiency, in helping to ensure each load-serving entity meets energy needs and reliability
 needs in hours to encompass the hour of peak demand of electricity, excluding demand met by variable renewable generation directly connected to a California balancing authority, as defined in Section 399.12, while reducing the need for new electricity generation resources and new transmission resources in achieving the state’s energy goals at the least cost to ratepayers.

(4) (A) On or before September 1, 2024, and consistent with the process and schedule adopted pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission and the Independent System Operator, shall determine if there is a need for the procurement of eligible energy resources based on a review of the integrated resource plans submitted by load-serving entities in compliance with the requirements of this section and Section 454.53 and the progress towards meeting the portfolio of resources identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 454.51.

(B) If the commission determines that there is a need for the procurement of eligible energy resources, the commission shall specify the eligible energy resources that should be procured to meet that need.

(C) Within six months of determining that there is a need for the procurement of eligible energy resources, the commission may request the Department of Water Resources to exercise its central procurement function to procure those eligible energy resources specified pursuant to subparagraph (B) that meet the portfolio of resources identified in subdivision (a) of Section 454.51.

(D) (i) Upon receiving a request pursuant to subparagraph (C), the Department of Water Resources, before January 1, 2035, may exercise its central procurement function to conduct one or more competitive
 solicitations and enter into contracts to procure eligible energy resources in order to achieve the policy of the state specified in Section 454.53.

(ii) Any contract entered into by the Department of Water Resources pursuant to clause (i) and approved by the commission pursuant to Section 80821 of the Water Code before January 1, 2035, shall remain in force for the duration of the contract.

(E) The Department of Water Resources’ exercising of its central procurement function to procure eligible energy resources pursuant to this paragraph shall be conducted in accordance with Division 29.5 (commencing with Section 80800) of the Water Code.

(b) (1) Each load-serving entity shall prepare and file an integrated resource plan consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) on a time schedule
 directed by the commission and subject to commission review.

(2) Each electrical corporation’s plan shall follow Section 454.5.

(3) The plan of a community choice aggregator shall be submitted to its governing board for approval and provided to the commission for certification, consistent with paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 366.2, and shall achieve all of the following:

(A) Economic, reliability, environmental, security, and other benefits and performance characteristics that are consistent with the goals set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) A diversified procurement portfolio consisting of short-term, midterm, and long-term electricity, electricity-related, and demand reduction products.

(C) The resource adequacy requirements established pursuant to Section 380.

(4) The plan of an electric service provider shall achieve the goals set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) through a diversified portfolio consisting of short-term, midterm, and long-term electricity, electricity-related, and demand reduction products.

(c) To the extent that additional procurement is authorized for the electrical corporation in the integrated resource plan or the procurement process authorized pursuant to Section 454.5, the commission shall ensure that the costs are allocated in a fair and equitable manner to all customers consistent with Section 454.51, that there is no cost shifting among customers of load-serving entities, and that community choice aggregators may self-provide renewable integration resources
 consistent with Section 454.51. The commission may order the procurement of resources with specific attributes by load-serving entities as a result of the integrated resource planning process and shall enforce any resource procurement requirements on a nondiscriminatory basis. Enforcement may include the assessment of penalties for noncompliance.

(d) To eliminate redundancy and increase efficiency, the process adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall incorporate, and not duplicate, any other planning processes of the commission.

(e) This section applies to an electrical cooperative, as defined in Section 2776, only if the electrical cooperative has an annual electrical demand exceeding 700 gigawatthours, as determined based on a three-year average commencing with January 1, 2013.

(f) (1) The
 commission shall not include the energy, capacity, or any attribute from Diablo Canyon Unit 1 beyond November 1, 2024, or Unit 2 beyond August 26, 2025, in the adopted integrated resource plan portfolios, resource stacks, or preferred system plans.

(2) The commission shall disallow a load-serving entity from including in their adopted integrated resource plan any energy, capacity, or any attribute from the Diablo Canyon Unit 1 beyond November 1, 2024, or Unit 2 beyond August 26, 2025.

(g) For a thermal powerplant that uses nuclear fission technology not constructed in the twenty-first century, all resource attributes shall be retired on January 1, 2031, and shall be reported as a separate, line item resource for purposes of complying with Section 398.4.

(h) (1) Only a new energy resource that
 meets all of the following requirements is eligible to be procured by the Department of Water Resources pursuant to this section:

(A) The resource directly supports attainment of the goals specified in Section 454.53 without increasing the state’s dependence on any fossil fuel-based resources.

(B) The resource is determined by the commission to not be under contract at sufficient levels as shown in load-serving entities’ most recent individual integrated resource plans submitted to and reviewed by the commission pursuant to this section to achieve the goals specified in Section 454.53.

(C) The resource has a construction and development lead time of at least five years.

(D) The resource does not generate electricity using fossil fuels or fuels derived
 from fossil fuels.

(E) The resource does not use combustion to generate electricity, unless that combustion use is ancillary and necessary to facilitate geothermal electricity generation.

(2) Resources from a pump hydroelectric facility may be procured by the Department of Water Resources pursuant to this section if the pump hydroelectric facility does not exceed 500 megawatts and has been directly appropriated funding by the state before January 1, 2023.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380.

(2) “Long term” means a time period that includes five or more years in the future.

(3) “Midterm” means a time period between two and five years in the future.

(4) “Short term” means a time period between the present and two years in the future.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 713, Sec. 5.   (AB 2368)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

454.53.

(a) It is the policy of the state that eligible renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources supply 90 percent of all retail sales of electricity to California end-use customers by December 31, 2035, 95 percent of all retail sales of electricity to California end-use customers by December 31, 2040, 100 percent of all retail sales of electricity to California end-use customers by December 31, 2045, and 100 percent of electricity procured to serve all state agencies by December 31, 2035. The achievement of this policy for California shall not increase carbon emissions elsewhere in the western grid and shall not allow resource shuffling. The commission and Energy Commission, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall take steps to ensure that a transition to a zero-carbon electric system for the State of
 California does not cause or contribute to greenhouse gas emissions increases elsewhere in the western grid, and is undertaken in a manner consistent with clause 3 of Section 8 of Article I of the United States Constitution. The commission, the Energy Commission, the State Air Resources Board, and all other state agencies shall incorporate this policy into all relevant planning.

(b) The commission, Energy Commission, State Air Resources Board, and all other state agencies shall ensure that actions taken in furtherance of subdivision (a) do all of the following:

(1) Maintain and protect the safety, reliable operation, and balancing of the electric system.

(2) Prevent unreasonable impacts to electricity, gas, and water customer rates and bills resulting from implementation of this section, taking into full
 consideration the economic and environmental costs and benefits of renewable energy and zero-carbon resources.

(3) To the extent feasible and authorized under law, lead to the adoption of policies and taking of actions in other sectors to obtain greenhouse gas emission reductions that ensure equity between other sectors and the electricity sector.

(4) Not affect in any manner the rules and requirements for the oversight of, and enforcement against, retail sellers and local publicly owned utilities pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3) and Sections 454.51, 454.52, 9621, and 9622.

(5) Not consider the energy, capacity, or any attribute from the Diablo Canyon Unit 1 or Unit 2 powerplant after August 26, 2025, in achieving the policy
 described in subdivision (a).

(c) This section does not affect a retail seller’s obligation to comply with the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.).

(d) The commission, Energy Commission, and State Air Resources Board shall use programs authorized under existing statutes to achieve the policy described in subdivision (a).

(e) This section does not authorize the commission to establish any requirements on a nonmobile self-cogeneration or cogeneration facility that served onsite load, or that served load pursuant to an over-the-fence arrangement if that arrangement existed on or before December 20, 1995.

(f) This section does not limit any entity, including local governments, from accelerating their
 achievement of the state’s electric sector decarbonization targets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 36.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

454.54.

In addition to the requirements of Section 454.52, the integrated resource plan of each load-serving entity shall contribute to a diverse and balanced portfolio of resources needed to ensure a reliable electricity supply that provides optimal integration of renewable energy resources in a cost-effective manner, meets the emissions reduction targets for greenhouse gases described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 454.52, and prevents cost shifting among load-serving entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 431, Sec. 1.   (SB 618)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

454.55.

(a) (1) The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall identify all potentially achievable cost-effective electricity efficiency savings and establish efficiency targets for an electrical corporation to achieve, pursuant to Section 454.5, consistent with the targets established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) By July 1, 2018, and every four years thereafter, each electrical corporation shall report on its progress toward achieving the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) (1) By December 31, 2023, the commission shall, in a new or existing proceeding, undertake a comprehensive
 review of the feasibility, costs, barriers, and benefits of achieving a cumulative doubling of energy efficiency savings and demand reduction by 2030 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code, if the commission concludes the targets established for electrical corporations to achieve pursuant to subdivision (a) are not cost effective, feasible, or pose potential adverse impacts to public health and safety, the commission shall revise the targets to the level that optimizes the amount of energy efficiency savings and demand reduction and shall modify, revise, or update its policies as needed to address barriers preventing achievement of those targets.

(c) The commission shall ensure that there are sufficient moneys available to electrical corporations to meet the
 efficiency targets established pursuant to subdivision (a). This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the commission to impose or increase any tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 212.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

454.56.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall identify all potentially achievable cost-effective natural gas efficiency savings and establish efficiency targets for the gas corporation to achieve, consistent with the targets established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) A gas corporation shall first meet its unmet resource needs through all available natural gas efficiency and demand reduction resources that are cost effective, reliable, and feasible.

(c) By July 1, 2018, and every four years thereafter, each gas corporation shall report on its progress toward achieving the targets
 established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 25310 of the Public Resources Code, if the commission concludes in its review pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 454.55 that the targets established for gas corporations to achieve pursuant to subdivision (a) are not cost effective, feasible, or pose potential adverse impacts to public health and safety, the commission shall revise the targets to the level that maximizes the amount of energy efficiency savings and demand reduction and shall modify, revise, or update its policies as needed to address barriers preventing achievement of those targets.

(e) The commission shall ensure that there are sufficient moneys available to gas corporations to meet the efficiency targets established pursuant to subdivision (a). This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the
 commission to impose or increase any tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 842, Sec. 14.5.   (SB 1222)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

454.57.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Accelerating Renewable Energy Delivery Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The commission, the Energy Commission, and the State Air Resources Board have jointly estimated that the state’s installed electric generation
 may need a threefold increase in capacity to meet state carbon-free electricity policy targets.

(2) Record-setting renewable energy generation build rates are needed to meet the goals of the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program and the Senate Bill 100 (Chapter 312 of the Statutes of 2018) target of supplying 100 percent of retail sales of electricity from renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources. However, these build rates are not achievable without additional electrical transmission lines and facilities connecting new resources to consumers in the state’s load centers.

(3) In recent years, California has seen problems in delivering renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources to customers, including problems
 caused by constraints on the transmission system. First, there are generation pockets where the total potential output from renewable energy generation exceeds the capacity of the transmission system to export that energy. Second, there are load pockets where there is insufficient transmission capacity to import the renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources that are available. Both types of
 constraints should be promptly fixed so that all available renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources can be delivered to customers.

(4) Reducing the use of nonpreferred resources in disadvantaged communities has been a priority for those communities, and they would benefit from increased access to electricity from new renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources delivered to serve in-city loads.

(5) New transmission facilities have many steps that must be accomplished before they are online and delivering electricity. Major new transmission lines can take more than a decade from initial planning to operation.

(6) New transmission facilities should be planned proactively to support delivery to
 load centers from expected locations for future renewable energy resource and zero-carbon resource development, where those locations are identified in the integrated
 resource planning process pursuant to Sections 454.52 and 9621 or as part of longer range planning processes pursuant to Section 454.53.

(7) New transmission facilities should be designed to minimize the risk of transmission-triggered wildfires.

(8) New
 transmission facilities should be designed to facilitate renewable energy transmission across California to better manage the variability of electrical supply.

(9) The Independent System Operator has issued a 20-Year Transmission Outlook that identifies substantial additional transmission projects needed to integrate renewable energy resources and storage for retail suppliers within the Independent System Operator balancing authority. Given the scale of this challenge, there is an urgent need to prioritize and accelerate the substantial effort needed to build transmission projects with long
 development times.

(c) Recognizing that the Independent System Operator’s Federal Energy Regulatory Commission-approved tariff requires the Independent System Operator to plan and approve new transmission facilities needed to achieve the state’s goals, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Independent System Operator shall take notice of the state policies expressed in this
 section.

(d) In support of the state’s policy to supply increasing amounts of electricity from renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) and Section 454.53, beginning as soon as possible and not later than March 31, 2024, the commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall provide transmission-focused guidance to the Independent System Operator about resource portfolios of expected future renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources. The guidance shall include the allocation of those resources by region based on technical feasibility and commercial interest in each region to allow the Independent System Operator to identify and approve transmission facilities needed to interconnect resources and reliably serve the needs of load centers.

(e) In providing the guidance described in subdivision (d), the commission and the Energy Commission shall provide projections each year, including from the integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302 of the Public Resources Code and the load-serving entities’ integrated resource plans prepared pursuant to Section 454.52, to support planning and approvals by the Independent System Operator in its annual transmission planning process, including by doing all of the following:

(1) Providing projections of resource portfolios and electricity demand by region for at least 15 years into the future to ensure adequate lead time for the Independent System Operator to analyze and approve transmission development, and for the permitting and construction of the approved
 facilities, to meet the projections.

(2) Providing load growth projections, including projected growth from building and transportation electrification, that are consistent with achieving the economywide greenhouse gas emissions reductions required pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Providing projections of new renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources consistent with the build rates necessary to achieve the targets established in Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) and Section 454.53.

(4) (A) Providing resource projections that, combined with transmission capacity expansions,
 are expected to substantially reduce, no later than 2035, the need to rely on nonpreferred resources in local capacity areas.

(B) The resource projections in subparagraph (A) shall include consideration of
 cost-effective and feasible alternatives to transmission capacity expansions, including the use of energy storage resources, renewable energy resources, or zero-carbon resources that are located within the
 local capacity areas.

(5) Providing projections for offshore wind generation as identified by the SB 100 Joint Agency Report of the commission, the Energy Commission, and the State Air Resources Board, and
 informed by the strategic plan developed pursuant to Section 25991 of the Public Resources Code, to allow the Independent System Operator to identify and approve transmission facilities needed from offshore wind resource areas that would be sufficient to make offshore wind resources fully deliverable to load centers.

(6) Providing projections for increases in imports of electricity into the state that reflect the expected development of renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources in other parts of the Western Interconnection for the purpose of delivering clean energy to California balancing authorities.

(f) On or before January 15, 2023, the commission shall request the Independent System Operator to do both of the following:

(1) Identify, based as much as possible on studies completed before January 1, 2023, by the Independent System Operator and projections provided before January 1, 2023, by the commission and the Energy Commission, the highest priority transmission facilities that are needed to allow for increased transmission capacity into local capacity areas to deliver renewable energy resources or zero-carbon resources that are expected to be developed by 2035 into those areas.

(2) Consider whether to approve transmission
 projects identified pursuant to paragraph (1) as part of its 2022–23 transmission planning process.

(g) It is the policy of the state that new transmission facilities be built on a timely basis and in anticipation of new electrical generation that will be built to meet the state’s renewable energy resource and zero-carbon resource targets, with interim targets for transmission capacity additions that demonstrate adequate progress toward meeting these long-term transmission needs. The commission shall request that the Independent System Operator implement this policy by approving transmission projects needed based on a longer planning period
 supported by the guidance provided pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e). The projects should be approved in time to be online when needed, considering
 permitting and construction lead times.

(h) It is the policy of the state that planning for new transmission facilities considers
 the following goals:

(1) Minimizing the risk of wildfire.

(2) Increasing systemwide reliability and cost efficiency, including through the sharing of diverse electrical generation resources within California and with other parts of the Western Interconnection.

(3) Eliminating transmission constraints that prevent electrical generation resources from delivering to the wider grid and that prevent importing energy into load pockets.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local capacity area” means a transmission constrained load pocket, as identified by the Independent System Operator, where local generation capacity is needed for reliability due to insufficient transmission capacity into the load pocket to meet electricity demand with electricity from outside of the load pocket.

(2) “Nonpreferred resources” means electrical generation resources that are not renewable energy resources or zero-carbon resources pursuant to Section 454.53.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 358, Sec. 1.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

454.58.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California must dramatically increase the capacity of its electrical transmission and distribution systems to meet the goals of Section 454.53 and to decarbonize its economy.

(2) The increase in transmission and distribution capacity must be done rapidly and cost effectively.

(3) California transmission utilities and the Independent System Operator can jointly explore opportunities to advance technologies that may quickly and cost effectively increase transmission capacity.

(4) Reconductoring existing transmission lines with advanced conductors and installing grid-enhancing technologies, such as advanced power flow control systems, dynamic line rating systems, and topology optimization software, can quickly and cost effectively increase transmission capacity.

(5) The benefits of these technologies include lower electricity rates, less wildfire risk, increased reliability, less transmission line congestion, less curtailment of renewable generation resources, and increased capacity to interconnect new renewable generation, storage, and other zero-carbon resources.

(6) Grid-enhancing technologies may expand and accelerate transmission capacity at a lower cost as compared to traditional transmission technologies.

(7) Reconductoring existing transmission lines with advanced
 conductors in existing rights-of-way can be accomplished at a fraction of the cost of building new transmission lines and are therefore often quite cost effective.

(8) Grid-enhancing technologies can be deployed within months and reconductoring with advanced conductors can be accomplished within one or two years. Other types of transmission capacity increases can take many years.

(9) The current transmission planning process assesses the value of transmission investments based strictly on the needs of a single assumed planning scenario of specific resources and geographies over a 10-year planning horizon, and does not appropriately incorporate the value that increased transmission capacity can provide in reducing risks surrounding major technology and permitting uncertainties, expanding optionality for load-serving entities, and delivering benefits over a longer time horizon.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Grid-enhancing technologies” means hardware and software that increases the capacity of electrical lines and improves the efficiency, reliability, and safety of the grid. Grid-enhancing technologies include, but are not limited to, dynamic line rating systems, advanced power flow control systems, and topology optimization software.

(2) “Reconductored with advanced conductors” means replacing the existing electric conductor with a conductor that has a direct current electrical resistance at least 10 percent lower than existing conductors of a similar diameter on the system and may include rebuilding support structures or other associated facilities.

(3) “Transmission utility” means an
 electrical corporation that is a participating transmission owner that has turned over operation of its transmission system to the Independent System Operator.

(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, and every two years thereafter, each transmission utility shall prepare a study of the feasibility of projects using grid-enhancing technologies to achieve one or more of the purposes listed in paragraph (2). The transmission utility shall provide information on feasibility, cost, rating, implementation time, and any other necessary information to the Independent System Operator at the same time as any other projects proposed to be part of the Independent System Operator’s annual transmission planning process. The transmission utility shall request the Independent System Operator to review the results of the study as part of its annual transmission planning process for economic, reliability, and policy goals, and shall request
 the Independent System Operator to include grid-enhancing technologies in all transmission planning studies and analyses.

(2) The study shall be designed to identify projects using grid-enhancing technologies that can achieve one or more of the following:

(A) Increase transmission capacity.

(B) Reduce transmission system congestion.

(C) Reduce curtailment of renewable and zero-carbon resources.

(D) Increase reliability.

(E) Reduce the risk of igniting wildfire, by means of investments that are consistent with the transmission utility’s approved wildfire mitigation plan.

(F) Increase capacity to connect new renewable energy and zero-carbon resources.

(G) Increase flexibility to reduce risks surrounding technology and permitting uncertainties in statewide electrical system planning and improve optionality for load-serving entities.

(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, and at least every four years thereafter, each transmission utility shall prepare a study of which of its transmission lines can be reconductored with advanced conductors to achieve one or more of the purposes listed in paragraph (2). The transmission utility shall provide information on feasibility, cost, rating, implementation time, and any other necessary information to the Independent System Operator at the same time as any other projects proposed to be part of the Independent System Operator’s annual transmission planning process. Each
 transmission utility shall request that the Independent System Operator review the results of the study as part of its annual transmission planning process for economic, reliability, and policy goals, and shall request the Independent System Operator to include reconductoring with advanced technologies in all transmission planning studies and analyses.

(2) The study shall identify electrical lines where reconductoring with advanced conductors can achieve one or more of the following:

(A) Significantly increase transmission capacity.

(B) Reduce transmission system congestion.

(C) Reduce curtailment of renewable and zero-carbon resources.

(D) Increase reliability.

(E) Reduce the risk of igniting wildfire, where the investment is consistent with the transmission utility’s approved wildfire mitigation plan.

(F) Increase capacity to connect new renewable energy and zero-carbon resources.

(G) Reduce line losses.

(H) Increase the ability to quickly energize new customers or serve increased customer load.

(I) Increase flexibility to reduce risks surrounding technology and permitting uncertainties and improve optionality.

(e) (1) Upon submitting the study to the Independent System Operator pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) and except as provided in paragraph (2), each
 transmission utility shall make the study publicly available.

(2) Information in the study that is determined by the Independent System Operator, in consultation with the transmission utilities, to be necessary to protect the security of the electrical transmission system shall be withheld from public disclosure.

(f) Each electrical corporation operating a distribution system shall consider grid-enhancing technologies and reconductoring with advanced conductors as part of its annual distribution planning process.

(g) This section does not affect the right of a transmission utility to implement self-approved projects.

(h) This section does not affect any project previously approved by the Independent System
 Operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   (SB 1006)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

454.59.

(a) This section applies to the obligations on a state agency, except the State Water Resources Development System commonly known as the State Water Project, imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 454.53.

(b) Each state agency shall ensure that zero-carbon resources and eligible renewable energy resources supply 100 percent of electricity procured on its behalf by December 31, 2035.

(c) A state agency may satisfy the requirement in subdivision (b) by doing one or more of the following:

(1) Installing zero-carbon resources or eligible renewable energy resources behind the customer meter on state-owned or
 state-leased buildings to serve the state agency’s onsite load.

(2) Procuring zero-carbon resources or eligible renewable energy resources through the local publicly owned electric utility or load-serving entity, as defined in Section 380, providing retail service to the state agency, subject to any credit or collateral requirements or other applicable requirements imposed by the local publicly owned electric utility or load-serving entity, as defined in Section 380, as a condition for procurement on behalf of a customer.

(3) Participating in a voluntary shared renewable or green pricing program offered by a local publicly owned electric utility or load-serving entity, as defined in Section 380, if the resources serving the state agency satisfy the requirements of subdivision (d).

(d) New procurement commitments made
 on behalf of a state agency by its retail seller or local publicly owned electric utility after June 1, 2022, for zero-carbon resources or eligible renewable energy resources to serve the state agency pursuant to subdivision (c) shall satisfy all of the following criteria:

(1) The zero-carbon resource or eligible renewable energy resource shall be newly developed as a result of contracting and reach initial commercial operations on or after January 1, 2023.

(2) An eligible renewable energy resource or storage product shall be required to satisfy either of the criteria specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 399.16.
